Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 1 Psychiatry Residency Handbook Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 2 TABLE OF CONTENTS Welcome ……………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………….. 3 Overview ………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………… 4 Mission Statement ………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………….. 5 Faculty …………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………………….. 6 Overall Educational Goals …………………………………………………………………………………………………………… ……7 Required and Elective Rotations ………………………………………………………………………………………………………. 8 PGY Rotation Objectives …………………………………………………………………………………………………………………… 9 Program Policies ………………………………………………………………………………………………………………… ……………. 37 Communication Policy ………………………………………………… …………………………………………………………………… 49 Residency Program Details ………………………………………………………………………………………………………………. 52 Time off Requests ……………………………………………………………………………………………………………….. 55 Teaching Aids & Library Resources ……………………. …………………………………………………………………………….. 59 Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 3 Welcome! Congratulations on starting your Psychiatry Residency with us at Inspira Health! All your hard work leading to this point has paid off and the next phase of your journey is now just beginning. These next few years will be your “formative years” in your pro fessional career, and we are ecstatic to beapart of it. This handbook will serve asaguide on many different topics including: overarching goals, rotation specifics, program logistics, professionalism, amongst others. Please take your time to review ourpolicies and guidelines. You will be best prepared to start residency when you understand what the expectations are as a trainee and are for faculty. During the course of the year, supplemental information may also be given to you. Please be aware thatany policy in this manual is subject to change. For further clarification of clinical information and/or service requirements, please speak with your Program Director, the director of the individual service, or the chief/director of the clinical service site in which you are involved. Once again welcome to our family and we can’t wait to get started. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 4 OVERVIEW —PSYCHIATRY RESIDENCY PROGRAM Our psychiatry residency program is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME). The residency program in General Psychiatry offers a balanced training approach that provides ample exposure to psychotherapy and psychopharmacology in addition to training in all modalities that will be needed in the practice of Psychiatry. The program’s philosophical bases are a commitment to the holistic concepts of osteopathic medicine and the integration of the biopsychosocial model in understanding both pathology and treatment approaches. During the first two years of training, the resident experiences, clinically and academically, the biological, psychological, and social areas of mental health. Once this foundation is built, other treatment modalities such as family therapy, behavior therapy, cognitive therapy, psychodynamicallyoriented psychotherapy, and group therapy are introduced and complement the core training philosophy. The residency offers rich and diverse clinical experiences, close supervision,astrong didactic program, andacommitment to research as essential traini ng components. Each resident, with the assistance ofafaculty mentor, is encouraged to developaresearch project for completion during the fourth year. Special emphasis is placed on assisting the resident in developing this investigation throughout the last three years of training. Upon completion of the training program, the graduate is prepared to sit for the certification examination in Psychiatry given by the American Osteopathic Board of Psychiatry and Neurology and the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology (ABPN). Program graduates work in private practice, in community settings, and in academia. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 5 MISSION STATEMENT & PROGRAM AIMS Mission Statement: The Psychiatry Residency at Inspira Health will be committed to providing the highest quality educational experience with proper mentoring of all residents while fostering intellectual curiosity and diverse learning methods. It is our purpose to 1. Train well -rounded physicians who are equipped to handle the healthcare demands of the twenty first century 2. Explore new methods of training quality physicians 3. Learn from new research onafoundation of experience 4. Encourage good citizenship in the healthcare community 5. Advocate for the physical and mental well -being of our patients and our community regardless of gender, ethnicity, or socioeconomic status. Program Aims: The goals of the Inspira Psychiatry Residency Program are that the graduates will attain the professional, cognitive, and technical skills necessary to provide their patients with kind and compassionate care. The training program is designed to provide broad -based clinical training, with emphasis on both inpatient and outpatient care. Residents are assisted in mastering the six core competencies as wellas attaining or exceeding the Milestone targets as set forth by the ACGME for all trainees as part of the process for developing into outstanding, well -rounded physicians who can manageabroad range of psychiatric conditions. Other goals and objectives of the program include developing proficiency in obtaining clinical data through patient interviews, physical examinations, interpretation of imaging and laboratory data and utilizing such data appropriately. The program will support trainees as they learn how to deliver the highest quality and safest patient care using evidence -based medicine, quality improvement, patient safety tools andateam -based approach. The program will also promoteaculture of mutual learning, respect and education and acknowledgediverse views that will foster healthy discussions among, residents, clinicians, colleagues, patients, and families. This includes promoting and developing excellence in communication skills. We will nurture residents to become lifelong learners and they will upholdacommitment to adhere to ethical principles and carry out professional responsibilities. Promoting scholarly activity and opportunities for research with mentoring and faculty supervision will enhance the learning process. RESIDENCY PROGRAM FACULTY Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 6 Program Faculty The residency program in General Psychiatry draws upon the clinical and educational resources from the Psychiatry Department to train residents in the diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of psychiatric disorders and the common medical and neurological disorders related to Psychiatry. The teaching staff of the residency program consists of both paid and volunteer faculty who participate in the educational program on both full -time and part -time bases. Their diver sity of training and practice experience, involvement in scholarly activity, and commitment to educational excellence provideawell -rounded educational experience for psychiatry residents. FACULTY LISTING Stephen Scheinthal, DO Chair, Department of Psychiatry Zubair Khan, DO Program Director Rachel Shmuts, DO Vice Chair of Education Andrew Lopez, MD Adult Inpatient Unit Stephen Mateka, DO Pediatric Inpatient Unit (CAMHU) James Rogers, DO Consult Liaison Psychiatry Martin Forsberg, DO Geriatric Psychiatry (LIFE) Wanshu Di, MD Neurology Narsimha R. Pinninti, MD Outpatient Psychiatry Allen Masry, MD Inpatient Psychiatry Robert Steer, EdD Director of Psychometrics Lydia Vender, DO Child & Adolescent Psychiatry Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 7 OVERALL EDUCATIONAL GOALS Inspira Health Network Psychiatry Residency Program aims to provide an outstanding education in psychiatry, adhering to the Common and Psychiatry -specific requirements of the Accreditation Councilfor Graduate Medical Education (ACGME). Additional goals are to prepare graduates for the Psychiatry examination of the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology ( ABPN ) and American Osteopathic Board of Neurology and Psychiatry (AOBNP) and to equip them forawide variety of careers within P sychiatry. Overall goals of the program are delineated in the following categories: Patient Care 1. To provide high quality clinical experiences, rotations, and supervision in primary care, neurology, inpatient psychiatry, emergency psychiatry, consultation -liaison psychiatry, addiction psychiatry, geriatric psychiatry, child and adolescent psychiatry, and outpatient psychiatry, and exposure to forensic psychiatry, community psychiatry, and electroconvulsive treatment, as required by the ACGME. 2. To provide excellent training in diagnosis, differential diagnosis, pathophysiology, theoretical models, and treatments in psychiatry, including training in psychotherapies, as specified by the ACGME. 3. To provide exposure to and experience with the diagnosis and treatment of patients withawide variety of psychiatric conditions and an appropriate mix of ages, genders, socioeconomic statuses, and ethnicities. 4. To provide supervision that is appropriate to the resident's knowledge and skills, and to provide increasing autonomy and responsibility as the resident progresses through the program. 5. To provideavariety of elective rotations, including opportunities to pursue research and academic leadership during residency. Medical Knowledge 1. To provide regular, high -quality didactics coveringarange of topics, as required by the ACGME, and organized inadevelopmentally appropriate sequence across the years of training. 2. To provide other learning opportunities, such as regular conferences, Grand Rounds, case conferenc es, journal clubs, evidence -based psychiatry conferences, and psychotherapy seminars to enhance residents’ acquisition of existing knowledge and skills in lifelong learning. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement 1. To provide regular supervision, formative feedback, and evaluations, so that residents can incorporate feedback into their practice and education. 2. To provide instruction and experience in use of information technology with patient care and applying evidence from the literatu re to clinical experiences after locating and apprising evidence -based recommendations. 3. To provide instruction and experience in educating patients, families, other health care providers, Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 8 medical students, and junior residents. 4. To provide case conference s, case reviews, self -assessments and goal -settings, quality improvement activities, and other opportunities for residents to examine and improve their practice. Interpersonal and Communication Skills 1. To provide instruction and experience in communication with patients, families, other physicians and health care providers, health care agencies, and the public, acrossawide range of socioeconomic and cultural backgrounds. 2. To teach skills in consultation to other physicians and health care providers. 3. To prov ide instruction and experience in interviewing, empathic listening, and therapeutic interventions. 4. To teach skills in written communication, including maintaining timely, legible, and clinically appropriate medical records. 5. To teach skills in working in andleading multidisciplinary teams. Professionalism 1. To foster professionalism in both faculty and residents and provideasupportive, respectful, and collegial learning environment. 2. To help residents developaprofessional identity asapsychiatrist, including demonstrating compassion, integrity, and respect for others; responsiveness to patient needs that supersedes self - interest; respect for patient privacy and autonomy; accountability to patients, society and the profession; and sensit ivity and responsiveness toadiverse patient population, including but not limited to diversity in gender, age, culture, race, religion, disability, and sexual orientation. 3. To educate residents on ethical and professional issues relevant to psychiatry and to promote thoughtful discussion of these topics. Systems -Based Practice 1. To provide instruction and experience in working in different health care delivery systems. 2. To teach residents about specific issues in systems -based practice relevant to psychiatry, such as involuntary commitment, decisional capacity, other legal and forensic issues in psychiatry, and resources in the system available for treatment and support of patients. 3. To fosteraspirit of patient advocacy and skills in coordination of care. 4. To teach residents to incorporate considerations of cost effectiveness and risk benefit analysis into each patient encounter. 5. To provide opportunities to identify and work to solve systems errors. General 1. To fosteracollaborative, collegial, supportive, and respectful learning environment. 2. To provide high quality faculty supervision and teaching. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 9 3. To ensure adequate resources, program leadership, and staffing to allow for high quality education for residents. 4. To providearoutine, regular, and fair evaluation process for residents and faculty. 5. To provide opportunities for residents and faculty to give feedback about the program and each other, and to participate in program -improvement projects. 6. To provideafair disciplinary, remediation, and grievan ce process, as necessary. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 10 REQUIRED ROTATIONS PGY 1 • Adult Inpatient • Internal Medicine • Neurology • Consults PGY 2 • Adult Inpatient • CAMHU • Consults • Geriatric Psychiatry PGY 3 • Adult Inpatient • ER/Crisis • IBCU • Forensic Psychiatry • Consults • Addiction Psychiatry • Geriatric Psychiatry PGY 4 • Ambulatory ELECTIVE ROTATIONS OPTIONS • Child Abuse Rotation (CARES) • Developmental Disabilities (RISN) • Community Psychiatry Rotation • Forensic Psychiatry Rotation • OMT Rotation • Academic Psychiatry Rotation • Palliative Care Vineland • Family Medicine Rotation Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 11 Adult Inpatient Unit PGY 1 Goal: The goal of the psychiatry inpatient unit rotation is to provide supervised clinical experience and instruction in the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of psychiatric inpatients. Objectives: Residents completing the psychiatry inpatient unit rotation are expected to achieve proficiency in the following arenas and tasks: 1. Patient Care • Perform comprehensive psychiatric diagnostic interviews, includingaformal mental status examination. • Conduct comprehensive medical evaluations of psychiatric patients and be capable of integrating medical knowledge with clinical data. • Judiciously use diagnostic and therapeuticprocedures. • Make appropriate DSM ---5 diagnoses and learn how to develop appropriate differential diagnoses. • Formulate and implement treatment plans, taking into account psychiatric and medical co --- morbidities. Plans should begin to integrate various tre atment modalities. • Manage acute behavioral disturbances inasafe and effective manner. • Demonstrate the ability to educate patients and families about psychiatric illnesses, treatment plans, medications, and disposition planning. • Provide continuous care forpatients, including planning appropriate aftercare. 2. Medical Knowledge • Display appropriate knowledge of basic and clinical sciences relevant to Psychiatry. • Distinguish among the criteria for most major DSM ---5 disorders. • Learn how to integrate clinicalfindings, medical knowledge, evidence -based data, and good judgment. • Complete reading in required areas and demonstrate knowledge based on readings. • Describe the basic principles and applications of the major classes of psychotropic medications. Haveab asic understanding of their limitations, side effects, and important possible drug interactions. 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • Have the ability to utilizeavariety of educational resources, including information technology, in self---directedlearning. Seek out clinical knowledge without prompting. • Facilitate the teaching of medical students and other health care professionals. • Begin to demonstrate autonomy in medical decision -making and team leadership. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Sk ills • Demonstrate interviewing skills with facility in being able to establish rapport, clarify the purpose of the interview, attend to cues, make transitions smoothly, demonstrate empathy, and elicit important information from patients and collateral sourc es of information. • Can developatherapeutic alliance with patients and maintain appropriate professional boundaries. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 12 • Understand the role of other mental health professionals on the inpatient unit and be capable of working collaboratively as demonstratedby ability to leadamultidisciplinary treatment team. • Communicate effectively with patients’ other care providers (consultants, specialists, inpatient, outpatient). • Learn how to give formal oral and written case presentations, includingabiopsychosocial formulation. 5. Professionalism • Be reliable and punctual. • Respect patient confidentiality. • Complete medical records inatimely, thorough, and legible manner. • Demonstrate integrity, initiative, and accept responsibility for their own actio ns. • Demonstrate understanding of patients and their illnesses inasociocultural context, including displaying sensitivity to patients’ cultures, ethnicities, ages, genders, socioeconomic statuses, sexual minority statuses, and/or disabilities. 6. Systems - Based Practice • Demonstrate knowledge of practice and delivery systems. • Improve system of care by integration of their practice within the larger system. • Describe the basic legal issues involved in inpatient psychiatry, including indications for involunta ry commitment, informed consent, duty to warn, and medicolegal aspects of record keeping. • Evaluate risks, benefits, limitations, and costs of myriad available resources. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 13 Internal Medicine Rotation PGY 1 Goal : Upon completion of the Internal Medicine rotations, the resident will gain exposure toabroad range of acute medical problems in adults while developing the ability to evaluate and manage patients admitted with undifferentiated illness. The resident will also engage in problem solvingand be comfortable with the management of common acute and chronic diseases often encounter on the Internal Medicine hospital service. Objectives: Residents completing internal medicine rotations are expected to attain proficiency in the following arenas and accomplish the following tasks: 1. Patient Care • Communicate effectively and demonstrate caring and respectful behaviors when interacting with patients and their families. • Gather essential and accurate information about their patients. • Make informed decisions about diagnostic and therapeutic interventions based on patient information and preferences, up -to-date scientific evidence, and clinical judgment. • Develop and carry out patient management plans. • Counsel and educate patients and their families. • Use information technology to support patient care decisions and patient education. • Perform competently all medical and invasive procedures essential for the practice of general internal medicine. 2. Medical Knowledge • Demonstrate an investigatory and analytic thinking approach to clinical situations. • Demonstrateasufficient level of understanding of the clinical, basic, and social sciences that underlie the practice of internal medicine. • Be able to demonstrate applicat ion of clinical, basic, and social sciences knowledge to patient care, patient education, and the education of other members of the health care team. • Areas of knowledge will include understanding the pathogenesis, pathophysiology, epidemiology, historical issues, relevant physical findings, test utilization, means of confirmingadiagnosis, treatment, monitoring, and prevention of the most common inpatient and outpatient clinical disorders cared for by internists. • Understand how various aspects of disease are affected by gender, age, ethnicity, culture, and disability. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 14 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • Analyze practice experience and perform practice -based improvement activities usingasystematic methodology. • Learn how to self -evaluate cognitive, technical, attitudinal, and procedural aspects of care. • Locate, appraise, and assimilate evidence from scientific studies related to patients’ health problems. • Obtain and use information about their own population of patients and the larger population from which their patients are drawn. • Apply knowledge of study designs and statistical methods to the appraisal of clinical studies and other information on diagnostic and therapeutic effectiveness. • Use information technology to manage information and access on -line medical information to support their own education • Facilitate the learning of students and other health care professionals. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Demonstrate effective written, verbal, and non -verbal communication when participating in patient care, consulting and collaborating with colleagues and coworkers, teaching and presenting in the academic center, and most importantly, during information exchange and collaboration with patients and their families. • Create and sustain therapeutic and ethically sound relationships with patients. • Use effective listening skills and elicit and provide information using effective non -verbal, explanatory, questioning, and writing skills. • Work effectively with others asamember or leader ofahealth care team or other professional group. 5. Professionalism • Demonstrate respect, compassion, and integrity. • Demonstrate responsiveness to the needs of patients and society that supersedes self - interest; accountability to patients, society, and the profession; andacommitment to excellence and on - going professional development. • Demonstrateacommitment to ethic al principles pertaining to provision or withholding of clinical care, confidentiality of patient information, informed consent, and business practices. • Demonstrate sensitivity and responsiveness to patients’ cultures, ages, genders, and/or disabilities. 6. Systems -Based Practice • Understand how patient care and other professional practices affect other health care professionals, the health care organization, and the larger society. Understand how these elements of the system affect their own practice. • Know how various types of medical practice and delivery systems differ from one another, including methods of controlling health care costs and allocating resources. • Practice cost-effective health care and resource allocation that does not compromise quality of care. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 15 • Advocate for quality patient care and assist patients in dealing with system complexities. • Know how to partner with health care managers and health care providers to assess, coordinate, and improve health care. Know how these activities can affect system performance. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 16 Neurology PGY 1 Goal : The goal of the Neurology rotation is to provide an introduction to the care and evaluation of inpatients with neurological disorders. Objectives: Residents completing the Neurology rotation are expected to attain proficiency in the following arenas and with the following tasks: 1. Patient Care • Complete an accurate history and physical on assigned neurology patients. • Write ac curate and legible orders or correctly enter orders into the electronic medical record (EMR) on assigned neurology patients. • Establish proper diagnoses for assigned neurology patients. • Recommend treatment plans for assigned patient to the more senior resid ent or attending. 2. Medical Knowledge • Develop neurological exam skills under the guidance of the neurology attending. • Demonstrate an understanding of the basic and most current pathophysiology of common neurological disorders and apply this knowledge to the clinical care of patients. • Be able to explain and examine the interaction of neurological diseases with other organ systems and with other medical and mental illness. • Gain experience in the localization of findings on the neurological exam. 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • To prioritize clinical responsibilities, provide timely service, and seek appropriate consultation and support. • Develop the ability to use information technology to improve the resident’s fund of knowledge and technical skills to provide better care to patients. • Attending teaching rounds, conferences, lectures, and meetings pertinent to neurology. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Communicate effectively with other health care professionals. • Communicate with patients and their families in easily understood and culturally sensitive language. • Work effectively as bothamember ofaprofessional group and asagroup leader. • Demonstrate the ability to serve asaconsultant to colleag ues and other health care professionals. • Maintain comprehensive, timely, and legible medical records. 5. Professionalism • Understand positive and negative communication behavior and leadership characteristics. • Demonstrate appropriate nonverbal behavior. • Have commitment and responsibility for carrying out professional responsibilities. • Adhere to ethical principles. • Develop sensitivity toadiverse patient population, with respect for colleagues and other health professionals as well. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 17 • Function wellasateam member. • Be punctual. 6. Systems -based Practice • Describe the responsibility of the individual physician to the patient, the practice, and the overall health care system. • Describe the concepts of cost containment and cost-effectiveness, and learn the relative cost to the patient and society of studies and treatments requested/ordered. • Describe methods for ensuring that the practitioner and the practice group use scarce resources inasound, thoughtful, and cost -effecti ve manner. • Develop necessary skills required for the independent practice of neurological care. • Understand the role of the physician’s order, appropriate history, and the electronic medical record as they pertain to inpatient neurological care. • Understand how to utilize available resources in the hospital and electronic media to improve patient care and outcomes. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 18 Consultation Liaison Psychiatry Rotation PGY I Goal: Upon completion of the Consultation Liaison (CL) rotation the resident will be able to function effectively in medical settings to deliver psychiatric consultation and care. Objectives: Residents completing the CL rotation are expected to be proficientin the following tasks in the following arenas: 1. Patient Care • Integrate medical knowledge with clinical data. • Demonstrate judicious use of diagnostic and therapeutic procedures. • Formulateamanagement plan for the appropriate level of care. • Generateadi fferential diagnosis. • Provide comprehensive therapeutic and care plans, including plans for follow up. • Develop interview skills and document accurate mental status exams. • Respond and adapt to psychosocial aspects of illness and functional limitations. • Bean expert clinician and problem solver. • Demonstrate responsiveness to the needs of patients and society that supersedes self - interest; accountability to patients, society, and the profession; andacommitment to excellence and on -going professional develop ment. • Demonstrateacommitment to ethical principles pertaining to provision or withholding of clinical care, confidentiality of patient information, informed consent, and business practices. • Demonstrate sensitivity and responsiveness to patients’ cultures, ages, genders, and/or disabilities. 2. Medical Knowledge • Manage complex medical problems. • Demonstrate knowledge and skills in assessing patients for various non -psychiatric services throughout appropriate to level of training. • Demonstrate knowledge of how psychiatric conditions interact with and impact the management ofavariety of non -psychiatric conditions. 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • Review psychiatric and general medical literature to answer questions raised by non --- psychiatrist team members. • Apply knowledge of study designs and statistical methods to the appraisal of clinical studies and other information on diagnostic and therapeutic effectiveness. • Utilize information technology to manage information and support th eir own education. • Facilitate the teaching of students and other health care professionals. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Demonstrate compassion, respect, and professional integrity when relating to patients and their families and other staff. • Ensure medical records are timely, complete, and legible. • Skillfully obtain relevant assessment information concerning the nature and quality of the relationships between patients and their families and use this information in offering recommendations to the referring Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 19 physician. • Possess excellent listening skills. 5. Professionalism • Be reliable and punctual. • Respect patient confidentiality. • Slow integrity, initiative, and leadership. • Cooperate, promote teamwork, and have mutual respect. • Accept responsibility for one’s own actions. • Establishatherapeutic and ethically sound relationship with patients. • Demonstrate compassion, sensitivity to and respect for the dignity of patients, families and colleagues as persons. Have thoughtful consideration for all these people’s ages, cultures, disabilities, ethnicities, genders, and sexual orientations. 6. Systems -Based Practice • Demonstrate excellent knowledge and practice of delivery systems. • Improve system of care by integration of their practice within the larger system. • Completely evaluate risks, benefits, limitations, and costs of available resources. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 20 Consultation Liaison Psychiatry Rotation PGY 2 Goal: Upon completion of the Consultation Liaison (CL) rotation at the PGY 2 level the resident will be able to function effectively in medical settings to deliver psychiatric consultation and care. Objectives: Residents completing the CL rotation are expected to be proficient in the following tasks in the following arenas: 1. Patient Care • Integrate medical knowledge with clinical data. • Demonstrate judicious use of diagnostic and therapeutic procedures. • Formulateamanagement plan for the appropriate level of care. • Generateadifferential diagnosis. • Provide comprehensive therapeutic and care plans, including plans for follow up. • Develop interview skills and document accurate mental status exams. • Respond and adapt to psychosocial aspects of illness and functional limitations. • Be an expert clinician and problem solver. • Demonstrate responsiveness to the needs of patients and society that supersedes self - interest; accountability to patients, society, and the profession; andacommitment to exce llence and on -going professional development. • Demonstrateacommitment to ethical principles pertaining to provision or withholding of clinical care, confidentiality of patient information, informed consent, and business practices. • Demonstrate sensitivity and responsiveness to patients’ cultures, ages, genders, and/or disabilities. 2. Medical Knowledge • Manage complex medical problems. • Demonstrate knowledge and skills in assessing patients for various non -psychiatric services throughout appropriate to level of training. • Demonstrate knowledge of how psychiatric conditions interact with and impact the management ofavariety of non -psychiatric conditions. 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • Review psychiatric and general medical literature to answer questions raised by non --- psychiatrist team members. • Apply knowledge of study designs and statistical methods to the appraisal of clinical studies and other information on diagnostic and therapeutic effectiveness. • Utilize information technology to manage information and support their own education. • Facilitate the teaching of students and other health care professionals. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Demonstrate compassion, respect, and professional integrity when relating to patients and their families and other staff. • Ensure medical records are timely, complete, and legible. • Skillfully obtain relevant assessment information concerning the nature and quality of the relationships between patients and their families and use this information in offering recommendations to the referring physician. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 21 • Possess excellent listening skills. 5. Professionalism • Be reliable and punctual. • Respect patient confidentiality. • Slow integrity, initiative, and leadership. • Cooperate, promote teamwork, and have mut ual respect. • Accept responsibility for one’s own actions. • Establishatherapeutic and ethically sound relationship with patients. • Demonstrate compassion, sensitivity to and respect for the dignity of patients, families and colleagues as persons. Have thoug htful consideration for all these people’s ages, cultures, disabilities, ethnicities, genders, and sexual orientations. 6. Systems -Based Practice • Demonstrate excellent knowledge and practice of delivery systems. • Improve system of care by integration of their practice within the larger system. • Completely evaluate risks, benefits, limitations, and costs of available resources. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 22 Child and Adolescent Mental Health Unit (CAMHU) Rotation PGY 2 Goal: Upon completion of the CAMHU rotation the residents should be able to provide diagnostic assessment and treatment for children and adolescents with developmental disorders, disorders of attention, affective disorders, anxiety disorders, and psychosis. Objectives: Residents completing CAMHU rotations are expected to be proficient with the following tasks within the following competencies: 1. Patient Care • Show the ability to conductachild and adolescent psychiatric assessment including an age -appropriate mental status examination. • Demonstrate the ability to prescribe appropriate psychopharmacologic agents for children and adolescents. • Demonstrate the ability to utilize appropriate evaluation tools including medical, laboratory, radiological, and psycholog ical testing. • Demonstrate the ability to developacomprehensive formulation and inpatient treatment plan that includes biological, psychological, social, and spiritual domains. • Show the ability to conduct therapeutic interviews as tools for evaluation and treatment. • Learn and apply specific treatment strategies for adolescent substance use disorders. 2. Medical Knowledge • Demonstrate knowledge of the DSM -5 criteria for the major diagnostic categories seen in child and adolescent psychiatry settings. • Describe strategies for management of acute agitation of children and adolescents. • Know normal and pathological family dynamics and their relationships to the growth and development of children. • Show knowledge of the risk factors for suicide in children andadolescents. • Show knowledge of the standards and procedures for mandated reporting of child abuse. 3. Practice Based Learning and Improvement • Demonstrate the ability to learn independently by identifying one’s knowledge deficits and appropriately collec ting new information in that area. • Show awareness of how personal reactions and life history contribute to counter - transference. • Show awareness of counter -transference and its effects on patient care. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Exhibit theability to work on an interdisciplinary team by appropriately participating in all treatment team meetings. • Effectively communicate with families by conducting diagnostic and therapeutic interviews with family members. • Exhibit effective communication ski lls by obtaining informed consent for psychiatric treatment from parents and informed consent from minors. These skills include the ability to discuss risks, benefits, and alternative treatments in language understandable to minors and families. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 23 5. Prof essionalism • Show respectful and professional behavior by being on time to team and family meetings. • Demonstrate appropriate diligence of completing relevant paperwork, all evaluations, and patient care notes inatimely manner. • Show sensitivity to the depe ndent status of children and the ramifications of this aspect in the treatment alliance. 6. System -based Practice • Understand how the residential milieu environment works to positively or negatively influence the treatment of individual children or adolescents. • Demonstrate how to refer to other agencies that work with children and adolescents. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 24 Adult Inpatient Unit PGY 2 Goal: The goal of the inpatient unit rotation at the PGY 2 level is to provide supervised clinical experience and instruction in the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of psychiatric inpatients. Objectives: Residents completing the psychiatry inpatient unit rotation at the PGY 2 level are expected to master the following tasks in the following domains: 1. Patient Care • Perform comprehensive psychiatric diagnostic interviews, includingaformal mental status examination. • Conduct comprehensive medical evaluations of psychiatric patients and be capable of integrating medical knowledge with clinical data. • Judiciously use diagnostic and therapeutic procedures. • Make all appropriate DSM ---5 diagnoses. • Learn how to develop appropriate differential diagnoses. • Formulate and implement treatment plans, taking into account psychiatric and medical co ---morbidities. Plans should begin to integrate various treatment modalities. • Manage acute behavioral disturbances inasafe and effective manner. • Demonstrate the abilityto educate patients and families about psychiatric illness, treatment plans, medications, and needs for follow ---up. • Provide continuous care for patients, including planning appropriate aftercare. 2. Medical Knowledge • Display appropriate knowledge of ba sic and clinical sciences relevant to Psychiatry. • Distinguish the criteria for major DSM ---5 disorders. • Learn how to integrate clinical findings, medical knowledge, evidence -based data, and sound clinical judgment. • Complete reading in required areas and de monstrate knowledge based on those readings. • Describe the basic principles and applications of the major classes of psychotropic medications. Haveaworking knowledge of their limitations, side effects, and important potential drug interactions. • Discuss tr eatment strategies for major psychiatric disorders such as schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, depression, anxiety disorders, dementia, delirium, and substance use disorders. • Discuss management strategies for refractory psychiatric presentations of major • psychiatric illnesses. 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • Have the ability to utilizeavariety of educational resources in self ---directed learning. • Seek out clinical knowledge without prompting. • Facilitate the teaching of medical students and other health care professionals. • Begin to demonstrate autonomy in medical decision making and team leadership. • Utilize information technology to manage information and support their own education. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Demonstrate inte rviewing skills with patients by establishing rapport, clarifying the purpose of the interview, attending to cues, making transitions smoothly, demonstrating empathy, and eliciting Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 25 important information. • Developatherapeutic alliance with patients and mai ntain appropriate professional boundaries. • Understand the role of other mental health professionals on the inpatient unit and be • capable of working collaboratively, demonstrated by ability to leadamultidisciplinary treatment team meeting. • Communicate eff ectively with the patient’s other care providers. • Learn how to present formal verbal and written case presentations, includingabiopsychosocial formulation. • Demonstrate an increased self -awareness, especially in understanding and appreciating transference and countertransference issues. 5. Professionalism • Be reliable and punctual. • Respect patient confidentiality. • Complete medical records inatimely, thorough, and legible manner. • Demonstrate integrity, initiative, and accept responsibility for own actions. • Demonstrate understanding of patients and their illnesses inasociocultural context, including displaying sensitivity to patients’ cultures, ethnicities, ages, genders, socioeconomic statuses, sexual minority statuses, and/or disabilities. 6. Systems - Based Practice • Demonstrate knowledge of practice and delivery systems. • Improve system of care by integration of their own practice within the larger system. • Describe the basic legal issues involved in inpatient psychiatry, including indicationsfor involuntary commitment, informed consent, duty to warn, and medicolegal aspects of record keeping. • Evaluate risks, benefits, limitations, and costs of available resources. • Demonstrateamore comprehensive understanding of medico -legal issues includingan understanding of the rights of and obligations toward court -ordered patients, the use of forced medication, and the process of testifying in hearings. • Demonstrate an understanding of cost -containment strategies balanced by the clinical needs of the patie nt, including length of stay issues, medication panels, generic versus non -generic medications, and the rationale for the use of each. • Display an understanding of multiple levels of care, including day treatment, • supported housing, inpatient and outpatie nt options, and co -morbid substance use disorders treatment. Display understanding of the limitations of treatment based on health care policy and cost. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 26 Forensic Psychiatry PGY 3 Goal: Upon completion of the forensic psychiatry rotation at Ancora Psychiatric Hospital, the residents are expected to be proficient in the management of patients inalong -term mental healthcare inpatient hospital withafocus on forensics. Objectives: Resid ents completing inpatient forensic psychiatry rotations are expected to be proficient with the following tasks under the following competencies: 1. Patient Care • Completeathorough general psychiatric diagnostic assessment. • Formulateacase integrating bi ological, psychological, social issues, and forensic issues. • Generate and carry -outaplan of care, including pharmacological, psychological, and social interventions. • Perform adequate psychiatric diagnostic interviews inaforensic setting, including asse ssing patients who have been deemed “not guilty by reason of insanity” and patients who have been “Incapacitated to stand trial.” • Use appropriate laboratory, neuropsychological, and other testing in the diagnosis and monitoring of psychiatric inpatients. 2. Medical Knowledge • Display broad general knowledge of the expected signs, symptoms, course, treatment, and social manifestations of mental disorders, including personality disorders, substance use disorders, and the psychiatric expression of medical diso rders. 3. Practice -Based Learning • Locate and critically appraise scientific literature relevant to inpatient and forensic issues. • Regularly use information technology in the service of patient care. • Participate in practice -based improvement activities (askfor supervision when appropriate). 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Recognize their own characteristic responses to patients ("countertransference") and the effects of these responses on treatment. • Work effectively as part ofamultidisciplinary inpatient forensics team, collaborating with other mental health providers involved in the care of patients. • Createacollaborative relationship withawide variety of inpatients. 5. Professionalism • Respect patient autonomy and choice. • Demonstrate appropriate professional boundaries with inpatients inaforensic setting • Seek supervision for psychotherapeutic and pharmacologic assessments and interventions. • Dress professionally. 6. Systems -Based Practice • Make appropriate referrals for fu rther medical care when appropriate. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 27 • Appropriately advocate for quality patient care and help patients navigate system complexities. • Educate patients about available system resources for psychiatric illness and their role in accessing and working within th ese systems. • Communicate with mental health or other care providers, attorneys, and other relevant sources about the patient’s care (with patient consent). Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 28 Geriatric Psychiatry PGY 2-3 Goal: Upon completion of the geriatric psychiatry rotation the residents are expected to be proficient in the management of geriatric patients in ambulatory, sub -acute, and long -term care facility settings. Objectives: Residents completing the geriatric psychi atry rotation are expected to be proficient with the following tasks under the following competency domains: 1. Patient Care • Engage, collect information, evaluate, diagnose, and establishatreatment plans for geriatric patients who present with dementias and psychiatric/behavioral symptoms. • Complete in -depth assessments to determine the correct diagnosis while attending to possible comorbid medical and neuropsychiatric diagnoses. • Treat patients and their families using the mode of treatment most suitable for the patient in their current situation. 2. Medical Knowledge • Know the techniques and interview styles used in the evaluation of older adults with sensitivity to the cognitive disorders that are common in this population. • Know the multiple medical disorders that are co -morbid with and often precipitate psychiatric symptoms in older adults. • Know the various pharmacological modalities used in treating psychiatric disorders in older adults and the literature related to their effectiveness. • Know the psychopharmacologic interventions used in the treatment of cognitive disorders in older adults. • Know the indications and possible side effects for each of the treatments listed above. • Understand and use neuropsychological data, various imaging, and la boratory data to arrive at the correct diagnosis and treatment plan for each individual. 3. Practice -Based Learning • Locate and critically appraise scientific literature relevant to geriatric psychiatry. • Regularly use information technology in the service of patient care. • Participate in practice -based improvement activities (ask for supervision when appropriate). 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Ability to educate patients and families regarding psychiatric and cognitive disorders in the older adu lt population. • Ability to collaborate effectively with other members of the treatment team, such as primary care physicians and other therapists. 5. Professionalism • Demonstrate respect for the patient's and the family's stress during evaluation and treatment of psychiatric disorders in older individuals for whom this may be the first contact with psychiatry. • Demonstrate willingness to explain and discuss findings to patients, caregivers, and their families. • Have respect for and communication with ref erring physicians, therapists, and caregivers to optimize treatment. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 29 6. Systems Based Practice • Develop knowledge regarding the multiple systems of families, caregivers, and agencies necessary for the treatment of many older adults. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 30 Addiction Psychiatry PGY 3 Goal: Upon completion of the dual diagnosis/addiction psychiatry rotation, the resident is expected to be proficient in the management of patients inasubstance abuse mental healthcare center and to be comfortable with the management (including detoxification) of inpatients who haveasubstance use disorders and mental illness. Objectives: Residents completing the dual diagnosis/addiction psychiatry rotation are expected to be proficient with the following tasks under the following competency domains: 1. Pati ent Care • Completeathorough general psychiatric diagnostic assessment withafocus on substance use. • Formulateacase integrating biological, psychological, and social issues. • Perform adequate psychiatric diagnostic interviews in an inpatient substance ab use setting, including establishing rapport, eliciting important clinical information, and assessing emergent issues (e.g. suicidality, homicidality). • Use collateral information (e.g. from family members, caretakers, past treatment records) in assessment and treatment of substance use disorders. • Set appropriate goals for treatment and guide the patient through the process to discharge. • Prescribe appropriate pharmacological treatments treatment of substance use disorders. 2. Medical Knowledge • Demonstrate kn owledge of established and evolving principles and practice of psychiatric phenomenology, including the recognition and diagnosis of both general psychiatric conditions and substance use disorders. 3. Practice -Based Learning • Locate and critically appraise scientific literature relevant to substance use and patient care. • Regularly use information technology in the service of patient care. • Participate in practice -based improvement activities. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Enga ge patients in treatment and maintainabasic therapeutic alliance throughout the duration of treatment in the inpatient substance use setting. • Work effectively as part ofamultidisciplinary inpatient substance abuse team, collaborating with other mental health providers involved in the care of the patient (e.g. case managers, psychologists, social workers, nurses). • Createacollaborative relationship withawide variety of patients, including ones difficult to engage, so as to gain essential informationand build and implementatherapeutic plan. • Educate patients and their families and demonstrate an understanding of the stresses involved in havingasubstance use disorder. • Communicate effectively with patients, families, and others across the broad range of socioeconomic and cultural backgrounds served at Hampton Behavioral Health Care Center. • Interview patients and family in an effective manner to facilitate accurate diagnosis and the development of biopsychosocial formulations. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 31 5. Professionalism • Respe ct for patient autonomy and choice. • Seek supervision for psychotherapeutic and pharmacologic assessments and interventions. • Develop and demonstratearespectful attitude toward patients with addictive disorders. • Implement ethical principles in practice withpatients and co -workers. • Demonstrate appropriate professional boundaries in the context of interpersonal issues that arise during psychiatric care in relation to substance abuse. 6. Systems -Based Practice • Provide clinically appropriate and cost-effective care for patients with substance use disorders. • Appropriately advocate for quality patient care and help patients navigate system complexities. • Familiarize oneself of the range of services for patients with addictive behaviors including inpa tient and outpatient substance use programs, self -help groups, and other available resources. • Communicate with ancillary medical providers, mental health providers, and other relevant sources of information for patient care, with the patient’s consent. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 32 Adult Inpatient Unit PGY 3 Goal: The goal of the inpatient unit rotation at the PGY 3 level is to provide supervised clinical experience with progressive responsibilities and instruction in the assessment, diagnosis, and treatment of psychiatric inpatients. Objectives: Residents complet ing the psychiatry inpatient unit rotation at the PGY 3 level are expected to master the following tasks in the following domains: 1. Patient Care • Perform comprehensive psychiatric diagnostic interviews, includingaformal mental status examination. • Condu ct comprehensive medical evaluations of psychiatric patients and be capable of integrating medical knowledge with clinical data. • Judiciously use diagnostic and therapeutic procedures. • Make all appropriate DSM ---5 diagnoses. • Learn how to develop appropriate differential diagnoses. • Formulate and implement treatment plans, taking into account psychiatric and medical co ---morbidities. Plans should begin to integrate various treatment modalities. • Manage acute behavioral disturbances inasafe and effective manner. • Demonstrate the ability to educate patients and families about psychiatric illness, treatment plans, medications, and needs for follow ---up. • Provide continuous care for patients, including planning appropriate aftercare. 2. Medical Knowl edge • Display appropriate knowledge of basic and clinical sciences relevant to Psychiatry. • Distinguish the criteria for major DSM ---5 disorders. • Learn how to integrate clinical findings, medical knowledge, evidence -based data, and sound clinical judgment. • Complete reading in required areas and demonstrate knowledge based on those readings. • Describe the basic principles and applications of the major classes of psychotropic medications. Haveaworking knowledge of their limitations, side effects, and important potential drug interactions. • Discuss treatment strategies for major psychiatric disorders such as schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, depression, anxiety disorders, dementia, delirium, and substance use disorders. • Discuss management strategies for refractory psychiatric presentations of major • psychiatric illnesses. 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • Have the ability to utilizeavariety of educational resources in self ---directed learning. • Seek out clinical knowledge without prompting. • Facilitatethe teaching of medical students and other health care professionals. • Begin to demonstrate autonomy in medical decision making and team leadership. • Utilize information technology to manage information and support their own education. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Demonstrate interviewing skills with patients by establishing rapport, clarifying the purpose of the interview, attending to cues, making transitions smoothly, demonstrating empathy, and eliciting important informatio n. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 33 • Developatherapeutic alliance with patients and maintain appropriate professional boundaries. • Understand the role of other mental health professionals on the inpatient unit and be • capable of working collaboratively, demonstrated by ability to leadamu ltidisciplinary treatment team meeting. • Communicate effectively with the patients other care providers. • Learn how to present formal verbal and written case presentations, includingabiopsychosocial formulation. • Demonstrate an increased self -awareness, esp ecially in understanding and appreciating transference and countertransference issues. 5. Professionalism • Be reliable and punctual. • Respect patient confidentiality. • Complete medical records inatimely, thorough, and legible manner. • Demonstrate integrity, initiative, and accept responsibility for own actions. • Demonstrate understanding of patients and their illnesses inasociocultural context, including displaying sensitivity to patients’ cultures, ethnicities, ages, genders, socioeconomic statuses, sexual minority statuses, and/or disabilities. 6. Systems - Based Practice • Demonstrate knowledge of practice and delivery systems. • Improve system of care by integration of their own practice within the larger system. • Describe the basic legal issues involved in inpatient psychiatry, including indications for involuntary commitment, informed consent, duty to warn, and medicolegal aspects of record keeping. • Evaluate risks, benefits, limitations, and costs of available resources. • Demonstrateamore comprehensive understanding of medicogal issues including an understanding of the rights of and obligations toward court -ordered patients, the use of forced medication, and the process of testifying in hearings. • Demonstrate an understanding of cost -contain ment strategies balanced by the clinical needs of the patient, including length of stay issues, medication panels, generic versus non -generic medications, and the rationale for the use of each. • Display an understanding of multiple levels of care, including day treatment, • supported housing, inpatient and outpatient options, and co -morbid substance use disorders treatment. Display understanding of the limitations of treatment based on health care policy and cost. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 34 Ambulatory PGY 4 Goal: Upon co mpletion of the PGY 4 year, the residents should be able to function independently and to followalarge number of patients longitudinally. Throughayearlong experience, residents gainasense of the breadth and depth of psychiatric disorders and their tr eatment. Objectives: Residents completing the ambulatory outpatient experience are expected to proficient in medication management and psychotherapy and with the following tasks under the following competency domains: 1. Patient Care • Demonstrate the ability to apply supportive, psychodynamic, and cognitive -behavioral psychotherapies in both brief and long -term practice. • Develop biopsychosocial formulations that lead to appropriate treatment interventions. • Demonstrate the ability to saf ely use pharmacologic regimens that are evidence -based and appropriate for each individual patient. • Determine the appropriate use of medications and psychotherapy in the same patient. • Establish and maintainatherapeutic alliance with patients. • Maintainsappropriate professional boundaries in psychotherapeutic relationships while being responsive to the patient. 2. Medical Knowledge • Appropriately diagnose mood disorders, anxiety disorders, and psychotic disorders in an outpatient setting. • Appropriately dos e, titrate, and taper antidepressant mediations. • Appropriately dose, titrate, and taper mood stabilizers for bipolar disorder. • Exhibit the effective use of medications used in adjunctive treatment of mood and anxiety disorders. • Describe the basic principle s, techniques, and differences among each of the three core individual psychotherapy modalities. 3. Practice Based Learning and Improvement • Learn independently by identifying any knowledge deficits and appropriately collecting new information in those are as. • Demonstrate the ability to apply new knowledge to patient care issues. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Exhibit the ability to work with ancillary staff by responding quickly and professionally to staff requests concerning patient care issues. • Effectively communicate patient’s condition and needs when making referrals to other treatment providers. • Demonstrate appropriate and effective communication with primary care physicians involved in care of shared patients. • Demonstrate appropriate communication with other treatment providers involved in the care of shared patients. 5. Professionalism • Show respectful and professional behavior by being on time to meetings and patient appointments. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 35 • Demonstrate appropriate diligence to paperwork/docume nts by having all notes and write - ups completed inatimely manner. Attend to any deficiencies in the EMR as referenced by the office staff/office manager. • Demonstrate appropriate boundaries at all times. • Always notify site personnel when sick, late, ordelayed for duties. 6. System -based Practice • Know how to refer to other agencies within the system and make those referrals when appropriate. • Demonstrate the ability to work with medication formularies to minimize costs to patient. • Appropriately follows pr ocedures to procure needed medical treatment when necessary, including prior authorization and requesting/sending of medical records (with patient’s consent). • Works with health care managers to improve quality of and access to patient care within the facil ity. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 36 Outpatient Clinics PGY 4 Goal: Upon completion of the PGY 4 year, the residents should be able to function more independently and to followalarge number of patients longitudinally atapartial care program. Throughayearlong experience, residents gainasense of the breadth and depthof psychiatric disorders and their treatment. Objectives: Residents completing the community outpatient experience are expected to be proficient with the following tasks under the following competency domains: 1. Patient Care • Perform psychiatric diagno stic evaluations atacommunity mental health center. • Care for patients with chronic psychiatric illness in several community settings withinalarge not -for-profit psychiatric rehabilitation organization. This organization which supported housing, vocatio nal rehabilitation, mobile assessment, outreach, and other psychiatric services to the homeless mentally ill. 2. Medical Knowledge • Learn about the chronically mentally ill and mentally ill offenders. • Become familiar with the "recovery model" of mental health care. • Demonstrate an understanding of the larger system in which the community mental health center resides. 3. Practice -Based Learning and Improvement • Incorporate data fromavariety of sources into treatment planning and patient care while treating patients in the community on mobile assessment and outreach. • Locate and critically appraise scientific literature relevant to patient care. • Regularly use information technology in the service of patient care. 4. Interpersonal and Communication Skills • Work with case workers when they are interacting with patients in homes, on the streets, and in other public settings. • Learn and utilize engagement techniques for reaching difficult -to-treat and reluctant patients. 5. Professionalism • Demonstrate respect and compassion for others. • Demonstrate reliable attendance and appropriate professional attire. • Demonstrate integrity, accountability, and an ethical approach to outpatient treatment (e.g. maintaining professional boundaries and obtaini ng informed consent for treatment). • Demonstrate understanding of patients and their illnesses inasociocultural context, including displaying sensitivity to patients’ cultures, ethnicities, ages, genders, socioeconomic statuses, sexual minority statuses, and/or disabilities. • Demonstrate concise, accurate, and timely record keeping. 6. Systems -Based Practice • Experience the activities of community treatment of the chronically mentally ill as conducted inacommunity clinic and in non-institutional settings. • Gain experience working asateam member with case workers Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 37 PROGRAM POLICIES Professionalism Policy It is the policy of ROWAN -SOM Departmentof Psychiatry & Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Program to raise awareness of pro fessionalism within the community asawhole. In short, professionalism is comprised ofacombination of altruism, accountability, excellence, duty, honor, integrity, respect, and commitment to lifelong learning. Our professional policy is based on thefollowing beliefs: a. Residents and clinical fellows will demonstrate conduct consistent with the dignity and integrity of the medical profession in all contacts with patients, their families, the faculty, all School personnel, and all third parties conductingbusiness with the resident or Inspira Health / ROWAN -SOM. b. The resident will, inatimely fashion, fulfill their professional responsibilities. Failure to fulfill clinical, academic, and administrative duties, including completion of patient charts and duty ho urs logging, can result in remediation or disciplinary action, including suspension of any or all privileges. c. The resident will strive for personal growth and improvement and accept criticism with dignity, seek to be aware of their own inadequacies, be open to change, accept responsibility for their own errors or failures, and stray from displayingapoor attitude under stress. d. The resident will maintain appropriate relat ionships with other individuals, especially those encountered asaresult of their clinical training. e. Each resident will protect and respect the ethical and legal rights of patients. f. The resident will, inatimely fashion, clearly communicate all informa tion relevant to the safe, effective and compassionate care of their patients to their supervising staff. g. Both residents and faculty are expected to fulfilltheir professional responsibilities asaphysician to appear for duty appropriately rested and fit to provide the services required by their patients. h. Our residency program will help ensureaculture of professionalism that supports patient safety and personal responsibility. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 38 RESIDENTS' INPATIENT RESPONSIBILITY POLICY This policy is intended to assure that residents achieve the educational objectives that are central to learning how to conductacomprehensive psychiatric evaluation and care for psychiatric patients. The goals for this pro gram include the following: 1. Proficiency in evaluation and management of psychiatric inpatients, part icularly persons suffering from major mental illness. Specific areas of competence include: • Cross -sectional and longitudinal histories • Physical examination, laboratory evaluation, and appropriate consultations • Mental status examination • Differential diagnosis • Understanding the impact of psychosocial issues on illness and recovery • Recogniti on and treatment of substance use, including withdrawal and intoxication syndromes and management issues involving the dually diagnosed patient • Formulation and implementation of treatment plans 2. Understanding of the use of psychotropic medications 3. Knowledge andappreciation of the roles of nursing, social services, adjunctive therapy,psychology, and the therapeutic milieu of patient care 4. Familiarity with basic concepts of family interventions 5. Familiarity with mental healthcourt procedures 6. Familiarity with the relationship between the inpatient units and thecommunity mental healthsystem Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 39 This policy is for all PGY -I through PGY -IV residents. PROCEDURE 1. Residents are expected to be on their respective units by 8:0 0 a.m. each morning. The residents are expected to review the status of their patients throughacombination of taking report from nursingand/or reviewing the patients’ chartsand/or interv iewing the patient s. 2. The resident will attend all treatment team meetings and be prepared to review their cases with the treatment team. 3. Residents are expected to doacomplete and comprehensive admission assessment on each patient unless otherwise directed by the attending psychiatrist and complete daily progress notes on each of their patients unless otherwise directed by the attendi ng psychiatrist. 4. All new patients will be evaluated with the attending psychiatrist, and the treatment interventions will be reviewed with the attending psychiatrist. 5. Residents are expected to completeadischarge note on all patients who are being discharged on their service unless otherwise directed by the attending psychiatrist, and they are also expected to dictateadischarge summary. Also, onadaily basis, residents will be expected to review each of their patients ’ progress with the att ending physician and only initiate treatment interventions after the attending physician has approved it. 6. Residents will be expected to attend all scheduled case conferences both on and off of the unit. 7. Residents will be allowed vacation days ; however, it must be pre -arranged and pre -approved by the unit Medical Director as well as the Program D irector. Furthermore, the residents must make arrangements for their patients to be covered by other residents. A sign out sheet detailing every patient is helpful for other residents who are covering in the interim. In the event ofapersonal emergency whenaresident has to leave the unit in the middle of the day, it is mandatory that the unit attending be informed, and arrangements be made with the attend ing for care of their patients for the remainder of the day. Residents will be expected to do physical and neurological exams and order laboratory or radiology studies as clinical necessary to facilitate the care of their patients. 8. Residents will beexpected to complete all paperwork as directed by the attending physician, which may include mental health court papers, disability forms, or clinical summaries for aftercare providers. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 40 Psychiatry Residency OUTPATIENT PATIENT CLINIC RESIDENCY REQUIREMENTS The Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Program is dedicated to training residents to function effectively in the outpatientclinic. This experience is central to the effective functioning of the competent psychiatrist, andacontinuous 12 -month exper ience isarequirement. Residents learn psychotherapeutic and psychopharmacologic skills from the first day of residency through educational seminars and conferences, observation of psychiatric faculty, and being supervised on their own patients. However, during the required outpatient year, the resident learns and practices the required psychotherapy competencies in greater breadth and depth than was possible earlier in the residency, and additional skills necessary for the competent practice of psychiat ry are practiced. In addition, the continuous 12 -month experience givesalongitudinal understanding of the course of mental disorders as well as the process of psychotherapy and psychopharmacology. Procedure A. All residents doa12 -month contin uous, full time rotation in the outpatientclinic. B. Residents have one to two individual faculty supervisors during the outpatient year who useavariety of supervision methods to guide the resident’s progress in developing the requisite knowledge, skills, and attit udes. These include review of charts, case presentations, direct observation of interactions with patients, indirect supervision in regularly scheduled sessions with the attending, audiotapes of interactions with patients, and videotapes of interactions wi th patients. The outpatient supervisors will closely supervise the residents to be sure they haveabreadth and depth of experience, that their charts are completed accurately and promptly, and that they me et all the requirements of the outpatientservice. a. At the conclusion of the PGY 4 year, each resident will providealist of their current patients to the Program Director along with recommendations for follow -up. Residents will be responsible for proposing disposition recommendations for each of their patients, which will be discussed with the supervising attendings ina group meeting in the Spring of their 4th year prior to their graduation. b. These patients will be listed on the patientlog as well. C. Residents will develop competence in the five Psychotherapy Competencies during their PGY -III and PGY - IV years. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 41 SCHOLARLY ACTIVITY REQUIREMENT Goal: Each resident is required to completeascholarly project during residency. The goals of this project are to: 1. Demonstrate the ability to perform an in -depth, comprehensive, and scholarly litera ture search and analysis of onatopicwithin or related to psychiatry that is of particular interest to the resident. 2. Identify the potential clinical relevance of findings from research and the scien tific literature. 3. Develop oral presentation and teaching skills. 4. Developawritten scholarly product, such asacase report, data -based article, review article, research proposal, curriculum, or report ofaquality improvement (QI) study that is publishabl e. To accomplish these goals, each resident will work withafaculty advisor, and they will evaluate the resident's performance in achieving the goals and objectives of this project. Residents may collaborate on group projects, as long as each resident mak esasubstantial contribution to the project and meets the specific objectives listed below. Specific O bjectives Each resident will be proficient in the following domains at the completion of their scholarly activity: Knowledge • Conductacomprehensivereview of the literature relevant toatopic, clinical case, or research project. Skills • Identifyatopic area to review,aresearch project to participate in/complete,aclinical case appropriate for pres entation foracase report (e.g.anovel presentation of an illness, diagnostic dilemma, unexpected outcome), oraQI study to conduct onaclinical service. • Develop an oral presentation, including (as appropriate)aPowerPoint presentation, handouts, bibliography, arti cles for distribution, and/or other audiovisual materials (e.g. videotapes). • Effectively give an oral presentation, includingascholarly discussion of the topic, research, or issues raised byaclinical case. • Writearesearch paper, research proposal (e.g. grant or part ofagrant), review article, annotated bibliography, case report and discussion, report ofaQI study, or curriculum. Attitudes • Understand and appreciate the role of scholarship and critical review of the literature in improvi ng one's clinical practice, teaching, and/or performing research. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 42 Resident Faculty Advisor/Mentor Responsibilities Policy Psychiatry residents are assigned toamentor throughout their four years of training. The advisor’s role is to be the resident’s mentor in issues of professional training and career planning, as well as to assist in the resident’s ongoing training and evaluation process. The mentor undertakes the following primary responsibilities: 1. Set upaschedule for regular meetings with the resident for the academic year, focusing on plans for self - asse ssment and monitoring progress. 2. Provide residents with advice to help them study for the psychiatric boards and prepare for in -service exams (e.g. PRITE) and quizzes starti ng early in their PGY -I year and fol low-up on these plans over time. The minimum frequency of meetings is once per quarter. 3. Discuss resident’s performance on the PRITE. For those residents who fall below the national mean, the resident and faculty advisor will developaremediation plan to improve the identified areas of weakness. The plan will be closely monitored to assist the resident in attaining scores at or above the national mean. 4. Guide the resident to an appropriate mentor for his or her research project. The goal is for each resident to developaresearch interest and become involved in an independent research study under the guidance ofamentor. The mentor also assists the resid ent in becoming part of any ongoing projects by the end of the PGY -IV. 5. Provide additional focus on career gu idance to residents in the PGY -II through PGY -IV years. After exploring their interests and future plans, it may be necessary to direct residentsto other faculty members who may provide additional guidance in the resident’s field of interest. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 43 SUPERVISION OF RESIDENTS POLICY Resident A resident isaphysician who is engaged inagraduate education program in P sychiatryorapsychiatric subspecia lty and who participates in patient care under the direction of attending physicians (or licensed independent practitioners). As part of their education al program, residents are given gradedand progressive responsibilities according to the individualresident’s clinical experience, judgment, knowledge, and technical skill s. Each resident must know the limits of their scope of authority and the circumstances under which they are permitted to act with conditional independence. Residents are responsible forasking for help from the supervising physician (or other appropriate licensed practitioner) for the service they are rotating on when they are uncertain of diagnosis, how to performadiagnostic or therapeutic intervention, or how to implement an appropr iate plan of care. Attending of Record ( “Attend ing”) An identifiable, appropriately -credentialed, and privileged attending physician, or licensed independent practitioner, who is ultimately responsible for the management of the individual patient and for the supervision of residents involved in the care of the patient. The attending delegates portions of care to residents based on the needs of the patient and the skills of the residents. Supervision To ensure oversight of resident supervision and graded authority and responsibility, the following levels of supervision are recognized: 1. Direct Supervision – the supervisor (attending, licensed independent practitioner, or senior resident with documented supervisory capability) is physically present with the resident and patient. 2. Indirect Supervision a) With direct supervision immediately available – The supervisor is physically within the hospital or other site of patient care and is im mediately available to provide directsupervision if need be after the resident has seen the patient. b) Without direct supervision available – The supervi sor is not physically present within the hospital or other site of patient care, but is immediately available by means of telephonic and/or electronic modalities and is available to come to the si te of care in order to provide direct supervision if need be. 2. Oversight – The supervising physician is available to provide review of patient care with feedback provided after care is delivered. Clinical Responsibilities The clinical responsibilities for each resident are based on PGY level, patient safety, resid ent education, severity and complexity of patient illness/condition, and available support services. The specific role of each resident varies with their clinical rotation, experience, duration of clinical training, the patient's illness, and the clinical demands placed on the team. The following isaguide to the specific patient care responsibilities by year of clinical training. Residents must comply with the supervision standards of the service on which they are rotating unlessotherwise specified by th eir Program D irector. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 44 PGY -I PGY-II residents are primarily responsible for the care of patients under the guidance and supervision of the attending physician and senior residents. They should generally be the point of first contact when questions or concerns arise about the care of their patients. However, when questions or concerns persist, supervising residents and/or the attending physician should be cont acted inatimely fashion. PGY -I residents areinitially directly supervised, and when merited, wi ll progress to being indirectly supervised with direct supervision immediately available (see definitions above) by an att ending or senior resident. PGY -I residents may progress to being supervised indirectly with direct supervision available only after de monstrating competence in: a) The ability and willingness to ask for help when indicated b) Gathering an appropriate history c) The ability to perform an emerg ent psychiatric assessment d) Presenting patient findings and data accurately toasupervisor who has not seen thepatient PGY -II Intermediate residents may be directly or indirectly supervised by an attending physician or senior resident but will provide all services under supervision. They may supervise medical students. The attending physician is ultimately responsible for the care of the patient. PGY -III and PGY -IV Senior residents may be supervised directly, indirectly, or by oversight. They may provide direct patient care, supervisory care, or consultative services with progressi vely graded responsibilit ies as merited. They must provide all services ultimately under the supervision of an attending physician. Senior residents should serve inasuper visory role of medical students and junior, intermediate, andin the case of fellows PGYIV, V, or VI, PGY -III or PGY-IV residents. As resident supervisors, residents will in recogni ze their supervisees’ progress towards independence as is appropriate to the needs of each patient and theskills of the senior resident. The attending physici an is ultimately responsible for the care of the patient. Whenasenior resident is supervisingamore junior resident, both residents should inform patients of their respective roles in that patient’s care. Attending of Record In the clinical learning en vironment, each patient must have an identifiable, appropriately credentialed, and privileged primary attending physician who is ultimately responsible for that patient’s care. The attending physician is responsible for assuring the quality of care providedand for addressing any problems thatoccur in the care of patients. In this role, the attending of record must be available to provide direct supervision when appropriate for optimal care of the patient. The availability of the attending to the resident is expected to be greater with less experienced residents and with increased acuity of the patient’s illness. The attending must notify all residents they supervise of when they should be called regardingapatient’s status. The attending should notifythe resident of situations in which they need to be physically present or informed of situations pertinent to patient care. Situations that require direct attending involvement/presence /notification are: a) W hen the patient's conditiondeteriorates unexpe ctedly b) W hen additional information challenges the working diagnosis and/or treatment plan c) W hen information is obtained that raises concerns about the patient's risk for self -harm or harm to others Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 45 d) W hen the patient or family membersdisagree with the treatment plan e) W hen there are serious disagreements or conflicts within the treatment team orwith other services or providers f) W hen decisions need to be made that have major clinical or legal implications, such as decisions not to hospitalize suicidal or homicidal patients During on -call duty, the resident will notify the on -call attending when: a) The resident has any questions or concerns about thepatient or the care provided; b) W henapatient decide to leave against medical advice (AMA ) Supervision of Consults Residents may provide consultation services under the direction of attendings or supervisory residents. The attending of record is ultimately responsi ble for the care of the patient, and thus must be available to provide direct supervision when appropriate for optimal care. The availability of the attending and supervisory residents or fellows should be appropriate to the level of training, experience, and competence of the consult resid ent. The direct supervision of the attending is expected to be greater with increasing acuity of the patient’s illness. Information regarding the availability of attendings and supervisory residents or fellows should be available to residents, faculty memb ers, and patients. Residents performing consultations on patients are expected to communicate verbally with their supervising attending as soon as possible after seeing the patient and certainly within 24 hours. For night float/on call residents, the resid ent should communicate verbally with the supervising attending within the same call or night float shift. Any resident performingaconsultation where there is credible concern for the patient’s life, requiring the need for immediate intervention, MUST com municate directly with the supervising attending as soon as possible prior to intervention or discharge from the hospital. Supervision of Hando ffs/Sign -Out Residents, attendings, and other primary providers on psychiatry services must provide structuredverbal and electronic handoffs when transferring care ofapatient and must be available to receive handoffs when taking over the care ofapatient. Residents may be supervised directly or indirectly, by an atten ding or supervisory resident, when giving and receiving handoffs. Junior residents should be directly supervised in givingand receiving handoffs initially to establish competence. The attending physician remains responsible for assuring that appropriate handoffs are occurring and is ultimately respo nsible for the patient’s care. Resident Competence & Delegated Authority The privil eges of each resident’s progressive authority, responsibility, conditional independence, and supervisory role in patient care delegated must be assigned by the Program D irector and appropriate faculty members. The Program D irector must evaluate each resident’s abilities based on specific criteria, which include: a. Documentati on on at least three occasions ofaPGY -I’s readiness for indirect supervision with direct supervisionavailable. b. Documentation ofaPGY -I’s competence in providing and receiving handoffs. c. Satisfactory peer evaluations of residents by training call residents (supervisory residents evaluating junior residents) or by trainees (more junior residents evaluating supervisory residents) d. Clinical rotation evaluations e. Clinical skills assessments Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 46 Expectations Regarding Supervision Supervision is designed to help residents to learn the principles and practice of Psychiatry. Residents are supervised throughoutresidency as part of every clinical experience. Beginning residents have close, daily supervision. As residents progress through the residency, they will generally be supervised less closely and less frequently. Residents will be givenincreasing respon sibility for patient care inagraduated manner appropriate to their level of training and skills. In addition, senior residents are expected to supervise junior residents (with attending backup) during training call. Overview of Speci fic Required Types of Supervision by Post -Graduate Year: PGY-I • Daily supervision with inpatient Psychiatry attending on rounds • During Psychiatry rotations, one hour per week of supervision with the inpatient attending (apart from rounds) • Backup attending supervision when on -call (please see below for guidelines about when to contact your on-call backup attending) PGY-II • Daily sup ervision with inpatient/consult attending on rounds • One hour per week of sup ervision with inpatient/consult attending (apart fromrounds) • Back up atte nding supervision when on -call PGY-III • Daily sup ervision with inpatient/consult attending, as relevant • One hour per week of sup ervision with inpatient/consult attending (apart from rounds), as relevant • Back up attending supervision during clinic days and when on -call PGY-IV • Caseload supervision in every clinic (one hour per clinic day) • Back up attending supervision during clinic days and when on -call Interactions between residents and supervising faculty attendings are governed by the following principles: • Interactions between residents and attendings are expected to be respectful, collegial, and focused on the common goal of excellent patient care. • A resident should at all times have direct access (in person or by telep hone) toafaculty attending. • When the attending is on vacation or otherwise unavailable,aspecific covering attending will be designated. • A faculty attending on the clinical service in which patient care takes place is designated as the supervising attending and has the ultimate clinical and legal responsibility for the care provided, although the resident is encouraged(and may be required) to consult with other clinical or regular faculty supervisors. • Residents will present new cases to the attending on daily rounds on the inpatient and CL psychiatry services. • On outpatient rotations, the resident will present new cases to the attending (caseloadsupervisor) as soon as possible and will provide regular updates for ongoing cases. • Residen ts on Psychiatry services (i.e. not on Medicine, Pediatrics, or Neurology) will have at least two hours of individual supervision per week (including individual supervi sion with the inpatient/consult attending ). Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 47 • Asateacher, the supervisor/attending is ex pected to provide the resident with information, guidance, and choices in patient care. • The attending/supervisor needs to keep abreast of clinical issues on the service or with the resident’s patient caseload, and supervision needs to be sufficiently closeto allow them to notice problems. • The attending/supervisor needs to monitor the resident’s performance and give regular, constructive feedback. • The attending/supervisor determines how closely the resident needs to be supervised and how much reporting they expect fromaparticular resident, depending on the resident’s level of training, experience, and skills. • The resident is expected to be open to learning, willing to consult, and prepared to fully inform the attending/supervisor about all patient care is sues. In addition to all expectations listed above and within this policy, the supervising attending also needs to be informed by the resident of the following situations : • When the patient’s cond ition deteriorates unexpectedly • When additional informati on puts the working diagnosis in doubt or questions the treatment plan • When information is obtained that raises concerns regarding the patient’s riskfor self -harm and/or harm to others • When the patient or family membersdisagree with the treatment plan • When there are serious disagreements or conflicts within the treatment team or wi th other services or providers • When decisions need to be made that have major clinical or legal implications, such as decisions not to hospitalize suicidal or homicidal patients During on -call or night float duty, the resident will notify the on -call attending when: • The resident has any questions or concerns aboutthe patient or the care provided • When the patients decidesto leave AMA Any resident or supe rvisor who feels uncomfortable with any supervision relationship, for whatever reason, should consult the Program Director, Associate Program Director (if there is one), and/or Chief Resident at the clinical site for help and guidance. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 48 Patient Safety & Quality Improvement Patientsafety is the delivery of healthcare inamanner that employs safety methods and minimizes the incidence and impact of adverse events while maximizing recovery from such events. Qualityimprovement isaformal approach to assess the degree to which services pr ovided by healthcare professionals for individuals and populations increases the likelihood of the desired outcome and are consistent with evide nce-based standards of care. Quality improvement also includes the systematic effort to improve performance. The goal of this cu rriculum is to educate P sychiatry residents on the principles and practices of patient safety and quality improvement. Objectives and Expectations By the end of this curriculum, learners will be able to: 1. Discuss the historical background of patient safety (PS) and quality improvement (QI). 2. Define PS and QI problems specific to Psychiatry. 3. Demonstrateahigh quality handoff/sign -out by the end of intern year. 4. FormulateaQI project or participate inaproject that is already in progress. 5. Demonstrate behaviors associated with effective teamwork and interpersonal and communication skills. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 49 Communication Policy 1. At all times, Sharon Mead Kates, the Psychiatry Residency Program Manager, must have all current phone numb ers, addresses, andemail address. If any changes are made, you must notify her within four hours of the next business day. 2. All residents must have current Inspira Health email addresses. These will be assigned by Information Technology (IT) upon yourstarting residency. Some of your hub locations for clinical servicesmay also assign youemail addresses affiliated with their institutions. All residents are required to check their work EMAIL AT LEAST ONCE PER DAY, unless you are on “approved vacation” time. Personal emailaccounts, such as “yahoo” or “gmail” are not sufficient or HIPPA compliant for work related communications. 3. If on duty, when called by the Department of Psychiatry, you must respond within ONE HOUR of the call. 4. While on call, all residents must have immediate access toatelephone. If you do not haveaphone available, youwill be required to take call in -house. While on call, it is expected that all calls will be responded to WITHIN 15 (FIFTEEN) MINUTES of the call. 5. If your cell phone is malfunctioning, it is your responsibility to contact your program administration or your hub site immediately. 6. Please be advised that the Program Director will be doing intermittent and random audits on the daily messagesheets from the Department of Psychiatry answering service to ensure compliance with these guidelines. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 50 PERMIT/LICENSE GUIDELINES FOR RESIDENTS All PGY -I residents are registered by name with the New Jersey State Board of Medical Examiners (NJSBME). This registration is done by the Graduate Medical Education (GME) office. All PGY -II residents are required to obtainaNJ Permit from the NJSBME. The processfor applying forapermit is do ne in conjunction with the GME O ffice and the Department of Psychiatry Program Coordinator. Application information will come out in the December/Ja nuary timeframe during your PGY -I year. Fingerprinting for the permit MUS T be compl eted in May before starting PGY -II. The Department of Ps ychiatry requires that all PGY -III residents possessan New Jersey medical license by October of their PGY -III year. Failure to obtainaNJ License may result in extension of the residency program sincealicense is required for outpatient training, andaresidentis required to provide 12 months of continuous outpatient care to meet program requirements. The Department of Psychiatry will reimburse residents forthe cost of their NJ medical License. NJ medicallicense applications are completed online on the NJSBME website: https://www.njconsumeraffairs.gov/bme/Pages/applications.aspx Since the application process can take 12 weeks or longer, residents should apply no later than July of PGY -III. Residen ts must also meet with the GME O ffice to review the application proceduresand requirements before subm itting their application. Before submitting your license application to the NJSBME, you must makeacopy of your application and give it to the Program Coordinator. After receiving your NJ medicallicense, you must also obtain Federal DEA and CDS license s, and copies of all three documents must be submitted to the Program Manager /Department Administrator. All three documents must be renewed as necessary to be kept current, and as future renewals are obtained, copies must be also submitted to the Program Manager /Department Administrator. Psychiatry residents must meet the following requirements /performthe following actions to apply for and receiveaNJ medical license : 1. The resident will obtain the licensure packet from the NJSBME in July of their PGY -III year. These forms will be completed andacopy submitted to Sharon Mead Kates, the Program Manager, who will maintainafile for the resident. All supporting documents required by the licensure applicant must be com pleted by the first week of July of the ir PGY -III year. Submission of the licensing packet to the NJSBME will occur the first week of the PGY -III year. The Program Director may request proof of this submission via receipt from the NJSBME. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 51 2. The resident must holdafull medical license in New Jersey by October 15 of their PGY -III year. Failure to obtain licensure may result in delay of completion of the residency sincealicense is requir ed for outpatient training and the resident is required to provide 12 months of continuous outpatient careto graduate. 3. A copy of the New Jersey State medical license as well andacopy of Federal DEA and CDS licensesmust be submitted to the Program Manager /Department Administrator. As renewals are obt ained, copies must be submitted accordingly. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 52 RESID ENCY PROGRAM - DETAILS Professional Demeanor - Dress Code In addition to demonstratingthe skill and judgment necessary to provide patient care during clinical rotations, the resident will demonstrate academic honesty, professional decorum, and ethical behavior during all interactions with colleagues, staff, and patients. As the resident assumes greater levels of responsibility throughout the training program, they will developahigh degree of responsibility that may be carried forward into pra ctice. All residents are expected to comply with all institutional and program policies in their conduct, attendance, and availability. Residents are expected to conduct themselves inaprofessional manner at all times, including: 1. Abiding by the By -Laws, Rule and Regulations, Policies and Procedures of the Resi dency Training Program, ROWAN -SOM, Inspira Health, the Department, the medical center s, the medical staff, the New Jersey Department of Health, NJSBME, and the Code of Ethics of the American Osteopat hic Association as they currently exist and as theymay be amended from time to time 2. Accepting patient care and on -call responsibilities (not to exceed the CIR contract limit) as assigned by the Chief of Service, Chief Resident, or Program Director 3. Compl eting medical records promptly in accordance with accepted standards of documentation (see Section 7 for Documentation Guidelines for Medical Records) 4. Maintaining high professional standards of dress and behavior. Appropriate male attire includes shirt with tie, trousers (not blue jeans), andawhite lab coat with nametag and identification badge while in the hospital. Appropriate female attire includes dresses, skirts or slacks with tops, andawhite lab coat with nametag and identificat ion badge while in the hospital. Call Schedules and Responsibility for Each P atient’s C are Call schedules are sent to all trainees and faculty prior to the beginning of the month relating the name of the attending responsible for after -hours patient care. These schedules are also posted on the inpatient unit and are also locatedwith the call service for all institutions. Protocols - Common Circumstances Requiring Faculty Involvement Attendingswill be available for immediate consultation at all times. Attendingswill provide residentswith their preferred contact method at the time of orientation. Attendingswill notify residentsof backup attendingsin the event of expected absences from the service. In the event of an unexpected absence of an attending, the Pr ogram Director should be notified. Common circumstances requiring faculty involvement include but are not limited to unexpected events such as patient suicidal behavior, medical codes, missing patients, medical deterioration, need to transfer patients tohigher level of care, patient abuse, or severe drug interactions. High -risk patients with complicated medical or behavioral issues should also have attending involvement. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 53 Protocol - When Residents Remain on Duty beyond Scheduled Hours On their own initiative, residents may remain beyond their scheduled period of duty to continue to provide care toasingle patient. Justifications are limited to reasons of required continuity foras everely ill or unstable patient or ethical attention to the needs ofapatient or family. Under those circumstances, the resident must appropriately hand over the care of all other patients to the team respon sible for their continuing care and document the reasons for remaining tocare for the patient in question. That doc umentation must be submit ted in every circumstance to the Program D irector. The Program D irector must review eachsubmission of additional service and track both individual resident and program -wide episodes of extended duty. Didactics All didactics are mandatory for residents to attend. Residents are expected to attendam inimum of 8 0% of mandatory didactics. As special circumstancesoccur, trainees must notify the Program Director prior to the didactics in order to be excused for personal reasons. T he resident must participate in all scheduled lectures, conferences, and other academic programs unless absent for vacation, conference, or sick leave. Residents should complete all assigned readings. Ifafaculty member feels thataresident has not participated successfully, that resident will be referred to the Program Director who will, with the Residency Training Committee, develop an individualized remediation plan. This plan will be presented to the resident and monitored bythe Program Director. The Program Director will determine the resident’s successful completion of this remediation process. Didactics are considered protected time and held every Wednesday, from 8 am – 12 pm unless otherwise specified. When didactics are virtual - residents are still expected to be ataclinical site listening and participating in it. If for any reason, didactics are cancelled and/or not scheduled onagiven day, residents are expected to report to their clinical service asaregular work day unless told otherwise by the Program Director. Annual Resident In-Service Examinations The residentswill take the Psychiatry Resident in Training Exam (PRITE ) each fall. Resident will have access to question banks and be assigned questions periodically to help prepare for the PRITE. Resident Administrative Responsibilities The resident will assume all administrative responsibilities, including but not limited to on -call, preparation of reports, arranging for coverage if unavailable, andfollowing all policies of Inspira Health, the Department of Psychiatry, and all its affiliates. Any deviation will be investigated for possible disciplinary action by the Program Director in accor dance with all applicable Inspira and departmental policies, the CIR contract, and the corrective action policy. Resident Logs Residents log all cases seen on all rotations, inpatient and outpatient, using cumulative log forms provided by the training program. Residents will maintainalist of their outpatients using the patient log spreadsheet. Logs are to be turned at the compl etion of each rotation to the Program Director or Program Manager. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 54 Scholarly Activity Requirement Residents must writeascientific paper of publishable quality asarequirement for graduation from the Psychiatry Residency P rogram. Residents are provided with opportunities to conduct research projects leading to the writing ofascientific paper suitable for publica tion and are encouraged to collaborate with faculty. Residents can also present at conferences as first author or presentaGrand Rounds, along withafaculty member, in order to meet this requirement. Meetings Resident Monthly Check -in Meeting The Program Director & Program Manager will meet with each PGY class at least onceamonth, generally on Wednesdays after didactics. The purpose is to give all residents an opportunity to communicate their concerns, ask questions, or provide feedback forthe program. The program may also use this opportunity to communicate new changes that are anticipated in the coming future. All concerns raised will be addressed as best as possible at the time of when it is raised, and if not, it will be followed up andaddressed later when appropriate. Residents will be expected to attend this meeting barring an excused absence. Other Program/Institution Committee Meetings Residents are expected to partake in various committees including but not limited to: GMEC, PEC, SWOT analysis, etc. Residents interested in such committees should communicate their specific interests to the PD and then one can be assigned as deemed appropriate. Moonlighting/ Outside Employment Residents may be permitted to moonlight at the discre tion of the Program Director and accord ing to Inspira Health & the psychiatry department policies on outside employment. Residents wishing to moonlight must meet minimum criteria including being at leastaPGYIII Psychiatry Resident, having all appropriate licenses, andmust complete and submit the appropriate request form. The resident may not moonlight for institutions that are in direct competi tion with their insti tutions. Moonlighting may not interfere with the resident’s clinical duties and didactic responsibilities. Resident ’s performance will be monitored for the effects of moonlighting activities, and adverse effects (including rotation evaluations ) may lead to the withdrawal of permission. All clinical activity will be calculated into the duty hour 80 -hour work week mandate. Out of System Rotations Currently, no out of system rotations are permitted for Psychiatry residents. Only rotations required to meet AOA training requirements that cannot be met within the ROWAN -SOM / Inspira Health system may be approved. Prior to developing the rotation schedule each year, the Program Di rector will submit to Graduate Medical Education Office, the appropriate request and justification for any required rotation(s) that cannotbe accommodated within the ROWAN -SOM/ Inspira Health system. No exceptions will be made. Electives At the discretion of the Program Direct or, residents may substitute elective/selective rotations for some part -time rotations during the PGY-III year. Residents should contact the Program Director to discuss the desired rotations prior to the start of the assigned rotation. No selective/electi ve rotations will be approved outside the ROWAN - SOM/ Inspira Health at this time. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 55 Vacation and Holidays Residents receive time off for vacation and holidays in accordance with the ir employee contract. In order to schedule vacation or other time off, reside nts must coordinate with their colleagues on service as well as their rotation supervisor /attending and let them know about all vacation days prior to submission to the Program Director for their signature. Vacation days must be approved by the supervising attending on service and the Program Director. For rotations such as Adult Inpatient & CL, it is the responsibility of the requesting resident to coordinate with their co -resident on service to ensure at least 1 trainee remains on service with the attending. This is crucial in preventing disruptions to clinical care and education of medical students who work closely with residents. Once this is confirmed, the requesting resident can then seek permission from the supervising attending on se rvice. For the Internal Medicine rotation, it is the responsibility of the requesting resident to get approval from the Chief Resident of IM first, before submitting to the Program Director and Program Manager. All requests should be made at least 2 mont hs prior to the requested time off, to ensure cross coverage can be arranged. Residents should take no more than 1 week off per rotation month, however if they have 2 continuous months of the same rotation, they can take up to 2 weeks off. If the resident is onarotation where their attending is off for any period of time (not including hospital holidays), and there is no other attending covering (i.e. APN providing clinical care instead), the resident must immediately notify the PD/PM so they can be plac ed on an alternative service temporarily. Faculty days off do not always correlate with resident days off; therefore this must be communicated with the program. Ifaresident takesaday off without prior approval, they can be retroactively dockedaPTO dayby the program and subject to other consequences. Leaves Sick leave In accordance with your contract, employees are credited with sick leave days at the beginning of each academic year. When calling in sick or late, the resident is to notify Sharon Me ad Kates, the Program Manager, who maintains the attendance records forresidents, the outpatient office, their clinical service, and the Program Director. If the resident is unable to make all of these calls, the resident should call his or her co -resident or the Chief Resident, who will be responsible for making the calls. The Pro gram Director reserves the right to request that the resident provide medical documentation for sick leave if out for three (3) consecutive business days and after the third occurrence of sick leave during one academic year. Occurrence is defined as anyperiod of time taken for sick leave. The Program Director with the Psychiatry Education Committee reserve the right not to award academic credit if the resident has taken excessive leave during any given rotation. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 56 Other leave Medical, maternity, disabilit y, and family leaves may be taken in accordance with FMLA, New Jersey State Law, and yourcontract and Interim Agreement. Residents should consult their contract, Interim Agreement, and applicable Inspira & Psychiatry Department policies. Additional information about policies may be found in the Department office, through Human Resourc es, or the institution’s website. Residency Certificates In accordance with the Residency Training Requirements of the ACGME & AOA,acertificate will be awarded to each resident upon satisfactory completion of the residency program and fulfillment of all program, department al, and institutional requirements. Additional Resident Responsibilities Chief Resident Responsibilities The Chief Resident(s) assists the Program Director and program staff in achieving the educational objectives of the training program by serving asarole model and asaliaison with other residents. The Chief Resident also performsspecific assigned organizati onal and administrative duties, which include creating and monitoring the on-call schedule s, providing for emergency or other coverage as needed, participating in the orientation of new residents, and other related duties as assigned. The Chief Resident(s) reports to the Program Dir ector, Department Chair, and other staff on matters of department policy or procedure and patient care or educat ion within the training program. They assist in transmitting all pertinent information to the residents. The Chief Resident(s) reviews and enfo rces compliance with standards of conduct and professional demeanor among members of the resident staff. Representing all residents, they attend quarterly full departmental faculty meetings. They also serve on the Residency Training Committee and the Psych iatry Education Committee. The Chief Resident(s) may also bring issues, problems, or concerns to the attention of the Program Director or other appropriate service chief or administrator. Disciplinary problems and due process matters are handled in acco rdance with established institution’s policies and the ir contract. Student & Intern Teaching Residents are expectedto actively participate in ROWAN -SOM / Inspira teaching programs, including teaching students and interns assigned to service. In addition to constructively teaching from available clinical resources, residents assist in teaching clinical interviewing to second, third, and fourth year medical studentsand PGY-I trainees in both Psychiatry and other specialties as needed. PGY -IV residents may elect to lecture to medical students in the Brain and Behavior Block of the Pre -Clerkship Curriculum. Residents also participate in community - based educational pr ograms and make presentations in case conferences and seminars that are part of the didactic program. Documentation Guidelines for Medical Records Residents’ patient care responsibilities include proper documentation of patient assessment, care, education, and treatment activities. The documentation elements assessed by JCAHO Medical Record review follow immediately in this section of the handbook. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 57 Copies of the New Jersey Screening Document and Clinical Certificates for Involuntary Commitment for adultsand minors are included after the documentation guidelines. Evaluations Rotation evaluations The resident will complete all assigned rotations. The resident will be evaluated onamonthly basis on each rotation. The resident will have the opportunityto review all evaluations. PGY -III and above residents will also be evaluated annually by each outpatient/community mental health center supervisor. Any resident who does not passarotation or is felt unqualified byasupervisor will be referred to the Prog ram Director, who will, with the Residency Training Committee, develop an individualized remediation plan. This plan will be presented to the resident and moni tored by the Program Director. The Program Director will determine the resident’s successful completion of this remediation process. 360o evaluations In an effort to capture 360o degree evaluation of the residents, each resident will be evaluated by nursing staff/support staff quarterly each year. The residents will also perform peer -to-peer evaluations on other residents twiceayear. Program evaluations Residents will evaluate the residency program onceayear. Self-assessment Residents will also evaluate themselves using the self -assessment evaluation form. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 58 Leadership Opportunities: Wellness Chair • Promote resident physician wellness and camaraderie through bi -annual retreats and monthly/regular social events • Research and order spirit wear for the program to facilitate resident unity and foster supportive environment • Communicate with residents regularly to assess and gage wellness concerns and discuss with chief resident, program director, and coordinator Recruitment Committee : • Participate in meet and greets during each interview day during interview season • This committee contributesin the collaborative review of each applicant • Additionally, working to cultivate interest in our residency program at recruit ment events throughout the year. NJPA Program Representative • Liaise between the NJPA and training program • Share NJPA resident programming and service information with colleagues and Program Directors • Encourage membership by detailing benefits of and the impact organized psychiatry has on the profession and patients • Assist with planning and promoting the annual Psychiatrist in Service event • Collaborate on development of programs for recommendation to the NJPA Board of Trustees and implement once approv ed GMEC Resident Representative • Representatives are responsible for attending each of the quarterly scheduled GMEC meetings • Representatives are the “voice” of their respective trainees and as such should facilitate discussion among all the trainees in the ir program year; • They should identify issues to share with the program leadership and/or the GMEC and ensure confidentiality where appropriate • Representatives should not serve continuous terms, in order to allow other residents to have an opportunityto serve in this position as well Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 59 TEACHING AIDS AND LIBRARY RESOURCES Our students, residents, and fellows haveawide variety of resources available to them through the ROWAN -SOM Health Sciences Library. The Library’s collection is comprised of books, journals, media, and software in the basic and clinical sciences in suppo rt of both undergraduate and graduate medical education. An extensive collection of electronic, evidence -based resources has been developed to assist house staff in accessing information 24 hoursaday, 7 daysaweek, regardless of location. Information on all mental health topics is available through sources such as Psychiatry Online, PsycInfo, PsycArticles, and via the wide variety ofe-books ande-journals which the library licenses. Various point -of-care resource “apps” are available for download to mob ile devices. A professional reference service is available Monday through Friday. A full range of library services is provided by the library staff to aid house staff in obtaining information. Mediated literature searches are available for those workingon research projects or for patient care issues. In addition to Medline and other biomedical databases, library staff can provide searches of databases in psychology, psychiatry, social sciences, and the humanities. Residents are also encouraged to do theirown literature searches using any of the searching options that the Library has available; training is available and may be scheduled with library staff. In addition, the bibliographic reference management program, EndNote, is available to be downloaded by fellows, residents, students, and faculty at no charge. Interlibrary loan isaservice provided to obtain those journal articles or books which are not held inalibrary's collection or available online. Electronic delivery of documents is available for any article requested. You can accessafull and comprehensive list of Psychiatry textbooks at the ROWAN -SOM library website at https://www.lib.rowan.edu/som. Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 60 Inspira Health Psychiatry Residency Handbook 61 